District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.223

Abatement of existing proceedings; previously enacted rules and orders.

(a)

No suit, action, or other judicial proceeding lawfully commenced by or against any board specified in this subchapter, or against any member, officer or employee of the board in the official capacity of the officer or employee, shall abate by reason of the taking effect of this subchapter, but the court or agency, unless it determines that survival of the suit, action, or other proceeding is not necessary for purposes of settlement of the question involved, shall allow the suit, action, or other proceeding to be maintained, with substitutions as to parties as are appropriate.

(b)

No disciplinary action against a person engaged in a profession or occupation regulated by this subchapter initiated by a professional or other administrative body or any other proceeding lawfully commenced shall abate solely by reason of the taking effect of any provision of this subchapter, but the action or proceeding shall be continued with substitutions as to parties and officers or agencies as are appropriate.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, all rules and orders promulgated by the boards abolished by this subchapter shall continue in effect and shall apply to their successor board until the rules or orders are repealed or superseded.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.223.